Hawaii statutes.
[§346F-8] Multifacility locations. If
an entity conducts, operates, or maintains more than one nursing
facility, the entity shall pay the nursing facility sustainability fee
for each nursing facility separately. [L 2012, c 156, pt of §2, §5; am L
2013, c 142, §3; am L 2014, c 124, §2; am L 2015, c 69, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next